District of Columbia statutes.
8-231.18a

Enforcement of housing code regulations.

The presence of loose or peeling paint in residential premises in violation of the housing code regulations codified in Title 14 of the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations which constitutes a lead-based paint hazard under this subchapter, shall be enforced by the Mayor according to the provisions of this subchapter.

Mar. 31, 2009, D.C. Law 17-381, § 19a
as added Mar. 31, 2011, D.C. Law 18-348, § 2(l), 58 DCR 717
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 61(c), 59 DCR 6190
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-171 substituted “Enforcement of housing code regulations” for “Conforming amendment” in the section heading as enacted by D.C. Law 18-348.